Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4728.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin TASK FORCE ON EARLY CHILDHOOD EDUCATOR LICENSURE.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of children, youth, and families. new text end new text begin (c) "Early childhood" means the period of life from birth to the start of kindergarten. new text end new text begin (d) "Metropolitan area" has the same meaning given in Minnesota Statutes, section 473.121, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin (e) "Task force" means the Task Force on Early Childhood Educator Licensure. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The Task Force on Early Childhood Educator Licensure is established to generate a framework for individual licensure for early childhood educators in Minnesota. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Membership. new text end new text begin (a) The task force consists of the following members, appointed by the governor, except as otherwise specified: new text end new text begin (1) two members of the house of representatives, one appointed by the speaker of the house and one appointed by the house of representatives Democratic-Farmer-Labor caucus leader; new text end new text begin (2) two members of the senate, one appointed by the senate majority leader and one appointed by the senate minority leader; new text end new text begin (3) two employees of a child care center licensed under Minnesota Rules, chapter 9503, one from greater Minnesota and one from the metropolitan area; new text end new text begin (4) two individuals who are license holders of a family child care program licensed under Minnesota Rules, chapter 9502, one from greater Minnesota and one from the metropolitan area; new text end new text begin (5) two employees of an early child care and education program operated by a public school district or charter school, one from greater Minnesota and one from the metropolitan area; new text end new text begin (6) one representative of a federally recognized Tribe in Minnesota who has expertise in the Tribal early care and education system; new text end new text begin (7) one representative of a Head Start or Early Head Start program; new text end new text begin (8) two parents of children currently attending or who have attended any type of early care and education program in the past three years, one from greater Minnesota and one from the metropolitan area; new text end new text begin (9) one pediatrician with expertise in developmental and behavioral pediatrics or early childhood mental health, or a licensed mental health professional with expertise in early childhood development; new text end new text begin (10) one faculty member or researcher of a higher education or research institution with expertise in early childhood education or development; and new text end new text begin (11) the commissioner or the commissioner's designee. new text end new text begin (b) In making appointments under this subdivision, the governor must, to the extent practicable, reflect the racial, ethnic, cultural, and linguistic diversity of children, families, and early childhood educators in Minnesota and include representation from individuals with experience serving children with disabilities. new text end new text begin (c) Appointments must be made by August 1, 2026. new text end new text begin (d) Members of the task force serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority or until the task force expires. Vacancies must be filled by the appointing authority consistent with the qualifications required by this subdivision. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Officers; meetings. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner or the commissioner's designee must convene the first meeting of the task force by September 1, 2026. new text end new text begin (b) At the first meeting, the task force must elect a chair and may elect other officers as deemed necessary. new text end new text begin (c) The task force must meet at least monthly or as determined by the chair. The task force must meet sufficiently enough to accomplish the tasks identified in this section. new text end new text begin (d) Meetings of the task force are subject to Minnesota Statutes, chapter 13D. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Administration. new text end new text begin (a) Members must serve without compensation. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must provide support staff, office space, and administrative services for the task force. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin (a) The task force must, at a minimum: new text end new text begin (1) propose a plan for a new individual-based licensure system for early childhood educator qualifications; new text end new text begin (2) establish clear comparable competency frameworks in the plan for demonstrating professional qualifications aside from a postsecondary degree; and new text end new text begin (3) identify a method for increasing early childhood educator compensation in accordance with requiring individual licensure and educators achieving different levels of licensure. new text end new text begin (b) At its discretion, the task force may examine other related issues consistent with this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin On or before March 1, 2027, the task force must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over child care licensing summarizing the work of the task force and outlining the findings and recommendations of the task force. The report must include an implementation timeline to transition the state to its recommendation for individual licensure for early childhood educators. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin The task force expires the day after submitting its report under subdivision 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin TASK FORCE ON EARLY CHILDHOOD EDUCATOR LICENSURE; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of children, youth, and families for the Task Force on Early Childhood Educator Licensure established under section 1. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end